Hawaii, session 2025, GM15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all
collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated
with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining
unit (3) :
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $13,794,339 $31,117,883
Special funds $1,372,439 $3,123,377
Federal funds $1,034,374 $2,353,676
Other federal funds $108,330 $248,959
Trust funds $58,072 $130,663
Interdepartmental transfers $45,384 $103,401
Revolving funds $201,311 $458,134
Other funds $32,948 $74,458

Page 2 H.B. NO. 1029
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
American rescue plan funds $4,384 $10,440
Special fund CIP $13,800 $31,131
Of the above amounts, the following amounts are for the
department of education:
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $6,553,371 $14,727,230
Special funds $7,015 $15,892
Federal funds $96,168 $217,493
Other federal funds $8,499 $19,270
Trust funds $9,795 $21,798
Interdepartmental transfers $518 $1,180
Revolving funds $18,974 $43,109
SECTION 2. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.
PART II
SECTION 3. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to administration (JUD 601)
the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to
fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining

Page 3 1029
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive
representative of collective bargaining unit (3):
FY 2 0 2 5 -2 0 2 6 FY 2 0 2 6 -2 0 2 7
General funds $1,153,068 $2,615,366
Special funds $38,540 $86,760
SECTION 4. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be expended by the chief justice in the respective fiscal
year for the purposes of this part.
PART III
SECTION 5. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary
increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state officers and employees who
are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the same
compensation plans as those officers and employees within
bargaining unit (3):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $1,818,433 $4,122,157
Special funds $229,463 $522,294
Federal funds $72,973 $166,169

Page 4 H.B. NO. 1029
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
Other federal funds $6,222 $14,295
Trust funds $8,121 $18,805
Interdepartmental transfers $10,853 $24,854
Revolving funds $15,765 $36,446
Other funds $13,995 $31,498
Of the above amounts, the following amounts are for the
department of education:
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $709,171 $1,602,354
Special funds $13 $29
Federal funds $8,734 $20,060
Other federal funds $1,998 $4,592
Trust funds $604 $1,359
SECTION 6. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.
PART IV
SECTION 7. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to administration (JUD 601)
the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to
fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary increases and

Page 5 H.B. NO. 1029
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
G.D. 1
PROPOSED
other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, by the chief justice for state officers and employees
who are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the
same compensation plans as those officers and employees within
bargaining unit ( 3) :
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $97,725 $221,863
SECTION 8. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be expended by the chief justice in the respective fiscal
year for the purposes of this part.
PART V
SECTION 9. There are authorized from the source of funding
indicated below to Hawaii health systems corporation - corporate
office (HTH 210) the following sums or so much thereof as may be
necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the collective
bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the
exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit (3) who
is assigned to the Hawaii health systems corporation:
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
Special funds $893,530 $2,026,297
SECTION 10. Funds authorized by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the Hawaii health systems

Page 6 H.B. NO. 1029
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
corporation for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART VI
SECTION 11. There are authorized from the source of
funding indicated below to Hawaii health systems
corporation - corporate office (HTH 210) the following sums or
so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium
2025-2027 the salary increases and other cost adjustments
authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state
officers and employees who are excluded from collective
bargaining, assigned to the Hawaii health systems corporation,
and belong to the same compensation plans as those officers and
employees within bargaining unit (3):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
Special funds $49,704 $112,491
SECTION 12. Funds authorized by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the Hawaii health systems
corporation for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART VII
SECTION 13. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below to health premium payments (BUF 761) the

Page 7
H.B. NO.
1029
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
G.D. 1
PROPOSED
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost
items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive
representative of collective bargaining unit (3):
FY 2 0 2 5 -2 0 2 6 FY 2 0 2 6 -2 0 2 7
General funds $5,018,288 $10,620,297
SECTION 14. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART VIII
SECTION 15. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below to health premium payments (BUF 761) the
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary increases and other
cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, for state officers and employees who are excluded from
collective bargaining and belong to the same compensation plans
as those officers and employees within bargaining unit (3):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $392,700 $791,575

Page 8 H.B. NO. 1029
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
SECTION 16. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART IX
SECTION 17. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided
in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is
paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds
shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be,
from the respective funds.
SECTION 18. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, and
June 30, 2027, of the respective fiscal years, shall lapse as of
those dates.
SECTION 19. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.

1029
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED